Utah statutes.
9-4-501.   Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the Legislature to establish procedures to most
effectively and equitably allocate this state's private activity bond volume
cap authorized by the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in order to maximize the
social and economic benefits to this state.
